Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 11 Reciprocal Enforcement of Support [Repealed.]

15-11-1 — 15-11-42.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L 1979, ch. 260, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 177, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 263, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1996, ch. 129, § 5, P.L. 1996, ch. 131, § 5, P.L. 1996, ch. 132, § 5; P.L. 1996, ch. 133, § 5 effective January 1, 1997. For present comparable provisions, see §

15-23.1-101

et seq.